Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. Courses of Study

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 318 to 324.

Validity of sex education programs in public schools, 82 ALR3d 579.

79 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 781 to 783.

§ 21-9-101.
Educational programs for schools; standards; core of knowledge and skills; special needs programs; class size requirements; cocurricular activities.

The board of trustees of each school district within the state shall cause the schools under its jurisdiction to provide an educational program in accordance with uniform standards defined under this section and rules and regulations promulgated by the state board of education pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a).

Each school district within the state shall provide educational programs sufficient to meet uniform student content and performance standards at the level established by the state board of education in the following areas of knowledge and skills:

Common core of knowledge:

Reading/language arts;

Social studies;

Mathematics;

Science;

Fine arts and performing arts;

Physical education;

Health and safety;

Humanities;

Career and technical education;

World cultures and languages;

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 123, § 2.

Government and civics including state and federal constitutions pursuant to W.S.

21-9-102

.

Computer science.

For grades one (1) through eight (8), reading, writing and mathematics shall be emphasized under the common core of knowledge specified under paragraph (b)(i) of this section;

Common core of skills:

Problem solving;

Interpersonal communications;

Computational thinking and computer applications;

Critical thinking;

Creativity;

Life skills, including personal financial management skills.

In addition to subsection (b) of this section, each school district within this state shall provide programs designed for the special needs of those student populations specified within this subsection. Programs under this subsection shall be provided and shall identify special student populations in accordance with rules and regulations of the state board of education. The state board shall monitor the proportion of students in each special needs category, compared to available regional averages. Special needs student populations include:

Children with disabilities evaluated in accordance with rules and regulations of the state board as having intellectual disability, hearing impairments including deafness, speech or language impairments, visual impairments including blindness, serious emotional disturbance, orthopedic impairments, autism, traumatic brain injury, other health impairments, specific learning disabilities, deafness and blindness or other multiple disabilities, and who, because of the impairments, need special education and related services; and

Gifted and talented students identified by professionals and other qualified individuals as having outstanding abilities, who are capable of high performance and whose abilities, talents and potential require qualitatively differentiated educational programs and services beyond those normally provided by the regular school program in order to realize their contribution to self and society.

In addition to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, each school district within this state shall endeavor to maintain when practicable, in kindergarten through grade three (3) within the district, an average class size of no more than sixteen (16) students per teacher, excluding children with disabilities who spend more than fifty percent (50%) of their time outside of regular classroom instruction.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit school districts from establishing cocurricular activity programs which have as their purpose to provide educational experiences not otherwise provided by the local district. The legislature specifically encourages school districts to establish programs of this type.

It is the intent of the legislature that the funding mechanism established by law for schools encourage school districts to achieve the goal of reduced class sizes.

Not later than the 2002-2003 school year, all school districts shall provide instruction in world languages to students in kindergarten through grade 2 in accordance with standards promulgated by the state board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 178; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-178; Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 301(a); 1999, ch. 110, § 503; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 58, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; 2012, ch. 99, § 1; 2018 ch. 123, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in (c)(i).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “sixteen (16)” for “twenty (20)” in (d).

Laws 2012, ch. 99 § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, added (b)(i)(O); and in (b)(iii)(C), substituted “Computational thinking” for “Keyboarding.”

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 123, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (b)(i)(M), which read: "Applied technology."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “Career and technical” for “Career/vocational” in (b)(i)(J).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “World” for “Foreign” in (b)(i)(K); and substituted “world” for “foreign” in (g).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 201, effective July 1, 1997, provides: “In fulfilling its responsibility imposed by the Wyoming supreme court under Campbell County School District No. 1, et al., v. State of Wyoming, et al., (907 P.2d. 1238, Wyo., 1995), for establishing a school finance system which ensures each Wyoming student an opportunity to receive a proper education and which also assures the availability of adequate school buildings and facilities for the delivery of the proper education, the legislature directs activities and actions specified within this part [Part II of the act] in order to commence the implementation of the finance system and to assist continued development and final completion of this system.”

There is no subdivision (b)(i)(I) or (b)(i)(L) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Pilot project for expansion of foreign language instruction. —

Laws 2004, ch. 115, § 1, provides:

“(a)

The state superintendent of public instruction shall offer a pilot project for elementary foreign language instruction. The project shall:

“(i)

Be administered by the state superintendent through the department of education;

“(ii)

Operate for a period of five (5) school years, commencing with school year 2004-2005 and terminating in school year 2009-2010;

“(iii)

Expand existing foreign language instruction in up to fifty (50) elementary schools within the state from kindergarten through grade two (2) as required under W.S. 21-9-101(g), to kindergarten through grade six (6);

“(iv)

Identify and develop technology-supported program materials for grades three (3) through six (6) to be implemented in a portion of the participating pilot project schools in at least one (1) grade level each year beginning in school year 2004-2005 with grade three (3);

“(v)

Include alternate programs including ones that build on the methods found to be promising at the kindergarten through grade 2 level and, if possible, ones involving classroom instruction by teachers certified in foreign language instruction;

“(vi)

In cooperation with the University of Wyoming, establish initial and on-going training and professional development for teachers and teacher assistants;

“(vii)

Identify, develop and implement an assessment of the foreign language skills of participating students;

“(viii)

Develop and implement a distance-learning demonstration program for schools unable to acquire qualified teacher assistants.

“(b)

Participation in the pilot project shall be based upon applications submitted to the department of education not later than July 1, 2004, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the state superintendent, indicating the commitment and capability of the school to provide expanded foreign language instruction, including:

“(i)

Provision of weekly foreign language instruction at minimum levels prescribed by the state superintendent;

“(ii)

Participation in assessment and data collection efforts measuring and describing student foreign language achievement; and

“(iii)

Indication of school administration and board support for project participation.

“(c)

The state superintendent shall, as soon as reasonably possible following the effective date of this act, notify school districts of the pilot project established under this section and the eligibility requirements for project participation. The state superintendent shall select schools participating in the pilot project from among applicants without regard to school size, location or district, and shall notify applicants of the decision by not later than August 1, 2004.

“(d)

The state superintendent shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing and implementing the pilot project in accordance with this section.

“(e)

Each participating school shall provide necessary information and other assistance required by the state superintendent to develop and implement elementary foreign language instruction and shall prepare and submit reports required by the state superintendent to administer, review and evaluate the pilot project.

“(f)

Not later than November 1, 2005, the state superintendent shall report to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint education interim committee on project development and implementation, findings resulting from project review and student achievement and shall provide recommendations for continuance of the project. The report shall also include a detailed explanation of project expenditures and administration.

“(g)

If fewer than ten (10) elementary schools in the state apply to participate in this pilot project by July 1, 2004, or if fewer than ten (10) elementary schools are actively participating in the pilot project by July 1, 2005, the superintendent shall discontinue the pilot project offered under this act.”

Laws 2004, ch. 115, § 2, appropriates $2,000,000 from the school foundation program account to the state superintendent of public instruction to commence development and implementation of the pilot program for school years 2004-2005 through 2005-2006. This appropriation includes funding and authorization for one additional full-time position within the department of education or the equivalent.

Laws 2004, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2004.

Laws 2018, ch. 123, § 5, provides: "To the extent this act conflicts with 2018 House Bill 53, this act shall be given precedence and shall prevail over any conflicting provision."

Quoted

in

Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995).

Stated

in

State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Special education requirements of gifted students, 115 ALR5th 183.

§ 21-9-102.
Instruction in state and federal constitutions required; satisfactory examination a prerequisite to graduation.

All schools and colleges in this state that are supported in any manner by public funds shall give instruction in the essentials of the United States constitution and the constitution of the state of Wyoming, including the study of and devotion to American institution and ideals, and no student shall receive a high school diploma, associate degree or baccalaureate degree without satisfactorily passing an examination on the principles of the constitution of the United States and the state of Wyoming. The instruction shall be given for at least three (3) years in kindergarten through grade eight (8) and for one (1) year each in the secondary and college grades.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 94, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 99-140, 99-141; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-1406, 67-1407; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-258, 21-259; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 179; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-179; Laws 1975, ch. 43, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501.

Cross references. —

For requirement that candidate for administrator's or teacher's certificate pass test on constitutions, see §

21-7-304

.

Quoted

in

Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 21-9-103.
Penalty for failure to carry out requirements of W.S. 21-9-102.

Willful failure on the part of any school or college administrator or instructor to carry out the requirements of W.S.

21-9-102

shall be sufficient cause for the removal of such person from his position.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 94, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 99-143; C.S. 1945, § 67-1409; W.S. 1957, § 21-262; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 180; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-180.

§ 21-9-104.
Child sexual abuse prevention instruction.

A school district may include child sexual abuse prevention instruction in a health and safety program required under W.S. 21-9-101(b)(i)(G). A school district may provide instruction under this subsection in any appropriate manner, which may include age appropriate, evidence based instruction on:

Recognizing sexual abuse and assault;

Personal boundary violations;

Ways in which a sexual offender may groom or desensitize a victim;

Strategies relating to:

Disclosure of child sexual abuse;

Reducing self blame;

Mobilizing bystanders to respond to child sexual abuse.

If a school district chooses to provide instruction under subsection (a) of this section, the parent or legal guardian of a student shall provide written permission to the school district authorizing their student to participate before that student shall be allowed to participate in the instruction.

History.

2018 ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 133, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.